Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.290

Near fatalities—Review of case files—Investigation.

(1) When a caseworker or other employee of the department responds to an allegation of child abuse or neglect that is screened in and open for investigation and there is a subsequent allegation of abuse or neglect resulting in a near fatality within one year of the initial allegation that is screened in and open for investigation, the department is to immediately conduct a review of the caseworker's and caseworker's supervisor's case files and actions taken during the initial report of alleged child abuse or neglect. The purpose of the review is to determine if there were any errors by the employees under department policy, rule, or state statute. If any violations of policy, rule, or statute are found, the department is to conduct a formal employee investigation.

(2) A review conducted under this section is subject to the restrictions of RCW 74.13.640(4).

(3) "Near fatality" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.640.

[ 2015 c 298 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2015 c 298: "This act may be known and cited as Aiden's act." [ 2015 c 298 s 3.]